North Carolina statutes. Chapter 29. Intestate Succession.
Article 6. Children Born Out of Wedlock.

§ 29-19.
Succession by, through and from children born out of wedlock.

For purposes of intestate succession, a child born out of wedlock shall be treated as if that child were the legitimate child of the child’s mother, so that the child and the child’s lineal descendants are entitled to take by, through and from the child’s mother and the child’s other maternal kindred, both descendants and collaterals, and they are entitled to take from the child.

For purposes of intestate succession, a child born out of wedlock shall be entitled to take by, through and from:

Any person who has been finally adjudged to be the father of the child pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 49-1

through 49-9 or the provisions of

G.S. 49-14

through 49-16;

Any person who has acknowledged himself during his own lifetime and the child’s lifetime to be the father of the child in a written instrument executed or acknowledged before a certifying officer named in

G.S. 52-10(b)

and filed during his own lifetime and the child’s lifetime in the office of the clerk of superior court of the county where either he or the child resides.

A person who died prior to or within one year after the birth of the child and who can be established to have been the father of the child by DNA testing.Notwithstanding the above provisions, no person shall be entitled to take hereunder unless the person has given written notice of the basis of the person’s claim to the personal representative of the putative father within six months after the date of the first publication or posting of the general notice to creditors.

Any person described under subdivision (b)(1), (2), or (3) of this section and the person’s lineal and collateral kin shall be entitled to inherit by, through and from the child.

Any person who acknowledges that he is the father of a child born out of wedlock in his duly probated last will shall be deemed to have intended that the child be treated as expressly provided for in the will or, in the absence of any express provision, the same as a legitimate child.

History.

1959, c. 879, s. 1; 1973, c. 1062, s. 1; 1975, c. 54, s. 1; 1977, c. 375, s. 6; c. 591; c. 757, s. 3; 2011-344, s. 5; 2013-198, s. 9.

§ 29-20.
Descent and distribution upon intestacy of children born out of wedlock.

All the estate of a person who was born out of wedlock and dies intestate shall descend and be distributed, subject to the payment of costs of administration and other lawful claims against the estate, and subject to the payment of State inheritance or estate taxes, as provided in this Article.

History.

1959, c. 879, s. 1; 1999-337, s. 6; 2013-198, s. 10.

§ 29-21.
Share of surviving spouse.

The share of the surviving spouse of an intestate born out of wedlock shall be the same as provided in

G.S. 29-14

for the surviving spouse of a legitimate person. In determining whether the intestate is survived by one or more parents as provided in

G.S. 29-14

(3), any person identified as the father under G.S. 29-19(b)(1) or (b)(2) shall be regarded as a parent.

History.

1959, c. 879, s. 1; 1977, c. 757, s. 1; 2013-198, s. 11.

§ 29-22.
Shares of others than the surviving spouse.

Those persons surviving an intestate born out of wedlock, other than the surviving spouse, shall take that share of the net estate provided in

G.S. 29-15

. In determining whether the intestate is survived by one or more parents or their collateral kindred as provided in

G.S. 29-15

, any person identified as the father under G.S. 29-19(b)(1) or (b)(2) shall be regarded as a parent.

History.

1959, c. 879, s. 1; 1977, c. 757, s. 2; 2013-198, s. 12.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-198, s. 12, effective June 26, 2013, substituted “an intestate born out of wedlock” for “an illegitimate intestate” in the first sentence and deleted “illegitimate” preceding “intestate is survived” in the second sentence.